src/fst/affixes/nouns.lexc
!! # Veps Noun inflection
!! * Metrical feet
!! 	* Disyllables
!! 		* pyrrhic, dibrach : kala
!! 		* iamb	  	  : veneh
!! 		* trochee, choree  : sanha sana+N+Sg+Ill
!! 		* spondee	: landeh
!! 	* Trisyllables
!! 		* tribrach
!! 		* dactyl
!! 		* amphibrach
!! 		* anapaest, antidactylus : venehed 
!! 		* bacchius
!! 		* antibacchius
!! 		* cretic, amphimacer
!! 		* molossus

LEXICON N_
+TYÄ: # ;

LEXICON N_MUNA ! Stem vowel alternation ZERO-A-ZERO muna:mun
!:QAQ1 NMN_ ;
:a SG-NOM-SUF ;
+Sg+Ill:%>ha K ;
:%>a SG-OBLIQUE ;
! Plural
:%>a PL-NOM-SUF ;
:%>a PL-ACC-SUF ;
: PL-OBLIQUE ;


LEXICON N_SANA
! sana = pyrrhic <
! sanad = iamb   <
! sanha = trochee < *sanahan anapaest
:a SG-NOM-SUF ;
+Sg+Ill:%>ha K ;
:%>a SG-OBLIQUE ;
! Plural
:%>a PL-NOM-SUF ;
:%>a PL-ACC-SUF ;
:o PL-OBLIQUE ;
 R ;
 
LEXICON N_MARJ 

! The accusative singular has two forms, one is the same as the 
!! nominative singular in form and the other is identical to the 
!! genitive singular. This definition is dependent on the school
!! and its use should be associated with the user group, perhaps.

!!€gt-norm:   Noun 'berry / marja' - full paradigm: Noun - marj
!!€  marj: marj+N+Sg+Nom
!!€  marjan: marj+N+Sg+Gen
!!€  [marj, marjan]: marj+N+Sg+Acc
!!€  marjad: marj+N+Sg+Par
!!€  marjaks: marj+N+Sg+Tra
!!€  marjata: marj+N+Sg+Abe
!!€  marjanke: marj+N+Sg+Com
!!€  marjas: marj+N+Sg+Ine
!!€  marjaspäi: marj+N+Sg+Ela
!!€  marjaha: marj+N+Sg+Ill
!!€  marjal: marj+N+Sg+Ade
!!€  marjalpäi: marj+N+Sg+Abl
!!€  marjale: marj+N+Sg+All
!!€  marjan: marj+N+Sg+EssInst
!!€  marjadme: marj+N+Sg+Prl
!!€  marjanno: marj+N+Sg+Apr1
!!€  marjannoks: marj+N+Sg+Apr2
!!€  marjannopäi: marj+N+Sg+Egr
!!€  marjahosai: marj+N+Sg+Ter1
!!€  marjalesai: marj+N+Sg+Ter2
!!€  marjassai: marj+N+Sg+Ter3
!!€  marjahopäi: marj+N+Sg+Add1
!!€  marjalepäi: marj+N+Sg+Add2

!!€  marjad: marj+N+Pl+Nom
!!€  [marjoid'en, marjoiden] # checking needed: marj+N+Pl+Gen
!!€  marjad: marj+N+Pl+Acc
!!€  marjoid: marj+N+Pl+Par
!!€  marjoikš: marj+N+Pl+Tra
!!€  marjoita: marj+N+Pl+Abe
!!€  marjoidenke: marj+N+Pl+Com
!!€  marjoiš: marj+N+Pl+Ine
!!€  marjoišpäi: marj+N+Pl+Ela
!!€  marjoihe: marj+N+Pl+Ill
!!€  marjoil: marj+N+Pl+Ade
!!€  marjoilpäi: marj+N+Pl+Abl
!!€  marjoile: marj+N+Pl+All
!!€  marjoin: marj+N+Pl+EssInst
!!€  marjoidme: marj+N+Pl+Prl
!!€  marjoidenno: marj+N+Pl+Apr1
!!€  marjoidennoks: marj+N+Pl+Apr2
!!€  marjoidennopäi: marj+N+Pl+Egr
!!€  marjoihesai: marj+N+Pl+Ter1
!!€  marjoilesai: marj+N+Pl+Ter2
!!€  marjoihepäi: marj+N+Pl+Add1
!!€  marjoilepäi: marj+N+Pl+Add2
!:QAO1 NMN_ ;
: SG-NOM-SUF ;
+Sg+Ill:%>ha K ;
:%>a SG-OBLIQUE ;
R ; ! xxx check
! Plural
:%>a PL-NOM-SUF ;
:%>a PL-ACC-SUF ;
:o PL-OBLIQUE ;

LEXICON N_IGA ! igä:ig
:ä SG-NOM-SUF ;
+Sg+Ill:%>hä K ;
:%>ä SG-OBLIQUE ;
:%>ä R ; ! xxx check

! Plural
:%>ä PL-NOM-SUF ;
:%>ä PL-ACC-SUF ;
: PL-OBLIQUE ;

LEXICON N_LEIB ! leib:leib
: SG-NOM-SUF ;
+Sg+Ill:%>hä K ;
:%>ä SG-OBLIQUE ;
R ; ! xxx check
! Plural
:%>ä PL-NOM-SUF ;
:%>ä PL-ACC-SUF ;
: PL-OBLIQUE ;


LEXICON N_LIND ! lind:lind
: SG-NOM-SUF ;
+Sg+Ill:%>hu K ;
:%>u SG-OBLIQUE ;
R ; ! xxx check
! Plural
:%>u PL-NOM-SUF ;
:%>u PL-ACC-SUF ;
:u PL-OBLIQUE ;

LEXICON N_JAUH ! jauh:jauh
: SG-NOM-SUF ;
+Sg+Ill:%>ho K ;
:%>o SG-OBLIQUE ;
R ; ! xxx check
! Plural
:%>o PL-NOM-SUF ;
:%>o PL-ACC-SUF ;
:o PL-OBLIQUE ;

LEXICON N_SHAPUK ! šapuk
:U1 NMN_ ;

LEXICON N_UNI ! uni:un
:i SG-NOM-SUF ;
: SG-PAR-SUF_t ;
:e SG-OBLIQUE ;
R ; ! xxx check
! Plural
:e PL-NOM-SUF ;
:e PL-ACC-SUF ;
: PL-OBLIQUE ;

LEXICON N_POIG ! poig:poig
: SG-NOM-SUF ;
:a SG-OBLIQUE ;
R ; ! xxx check
! Plural
:a PL-NOM-SUF ;
:a PL-ACC-SUF ;
: PL-OBLIQUE ;

LEXICON N_VENEH ! veneh:veneh
: SG-NOM-SUF ;
: SG-PAR-SUF_t ;
:e SG-OBLIQUE ;
R ; ! xxx check
! Plural
:e PL-NOM-SUF ;
:e PL-ACC-SUF ;
: PL-OBLIQUE ;

LEXICON N_HANG ! hang:hang
: SG-NOM-SUF ;
: SG-PAR-SUF ;
:e SG-OBLIQUE ;
R ; ! xxx check
! Plural
:e PL-NOM-SUF ;
:e PL-ACC-SUF ;
: PL-OBLIQUE ;

LEXICON N_LANDEH ! landeh:land
!:EH1 NMN_ ;
:eh SG-NOM-SUF ;
:eh SG-PAR-SUF_t ;
:he SG-OBLIQUE ;
R ; ! xxx check
! Plural
:he PL-NOM-SUF ;
:he PL-ACC-SUF ;
:h PL-OBLIQUE ;

LEXICON N_SEIBAZ ! seibaz:seib
:az SG-NOM-SUF ;
:as SG-PAR-SUF_t ;
:ha SG-OBLIQUE ;
R ; ! xxx check
! Plural
:ha PL-NOM-SUF ;
:ha PL-ACC-SUF ;
:h PL-OBLIQUE ;

LEXICON N_KIRVEZ ! kirvez:kirv
:ez SG-NOM-SUF ;
:es SG-PAR-SUF_t ;
:he SG-OBLIQUE ;
R ; ! xxx check
! Plural
:he PL-NOM-SUF ;
:he PL-ACC-SUF ;
:h PL-OBLIQUE ;

LEXICON N_VANHAKOZ ! vanhakoz:vanhak
:oz SG-NOM-SUF ;
:os SG-PAR-SUF_t ;
:ho SG-OBLIQUE ;
R ; ! xxx check
! Plural
:ho PL-NOM-SUF ;
:ho PL-ACC-SUF ;
:h PL-OBLIQUE ;

LEXICON N_NAGRIZH ! nagriž:nagr
:iž SG-NOM-SUF ;
:iš SG-PAR-SUF_t ;
:he SG-OBLIQUE ;
R ; ! xxx check
! Plural
:he PL-NOM-SUF ;
:he PL-ACC-SUF ;
:h PL-OBLIQUE ;

LEXICON N_RUGIZH ! rügiž:rügi
:ž SG-NOM-SUF ;
:š SG-PAR-SUF_t ;
:he SG-OBLIQUE ;
R ; ! xxx check
! Plural
:he PL-NOM-SUF ;
:he PL-ACC-SUF ;
:h PL-OBLIQUE ;

LEXICON N_VEDEKAZ ! vedekaz:vedeka
:z SG-NOM-SUF ;
:s SG-PAR-SUF_t ;
:ha SG-OBLIQUE ;
R ; ! xxx check
! Plural
:ha PL-NOM-SUF ;
:ha PL-ACC-SUF ;
:h PL-OBLIQUE ;

LEXICON N_MEZ1 ! mez':me
:z' SG-NOM-SUF ;
:s SG-PAR-SUF_t ;
:he SG-OBLIQUE ;
R ; ! xxx check
! Plural
:he PL-NOM-SUF ;
:he PL-ACC-SUF ;
:h PL-OBLIQUE ;

LEXICON N_KENGATOI ! kengätoi:kengäto
:i SG-NOM-SUF ;
:n SG-PAR-SUF_t ;
:me SG-OBLIQUE ;
R ; ! xxx check
! Plural
:me PL-NOM-SUF ;
:me PL-ACC-SUF ;
:m PL-OBLIQUE ;

LEXICON N_AVADIM ! avadim:avadi
:m SG-NOM-SUF ;
:n SG-PAR-SUF_t ;
:me SG-OBLIQUE ;
R ; ! xxx check
! Plural
:me PL-NOM-SUF ;
:me PL-ACC-SUF ;
:m PL-OBLIQUE ;

LEXICON N_LUMI ! lumi:lu
:mi SG-NOM-SUF ;
:n SG-PAR-SUF_t ;
:me SG-OBLIQUE ;
R ; ! xxx check
! Plural
:me PL-NOM-SUF ;
:me PL-ACC-SUF ;
:m PL-OBLIQUE ;

LEXICON N_KONDI ! kondi:kond
:i SG-NOM-SUF ;
:ja SG-OBLIQUE ;
R ; ! xxx check
! Plural
:ja PL-NOM-SUF ;
:ja PL-ACC-SUF ;
:j PL-OBLIQUE ;

LEXICON N_TEGII ! tegii:tegi
:i SG-NOM-SUF ;
:ja SG-OBLIQUE ;
R ; ! xxx check
! Plural
:ja PL-NOM-SUF ;
:ja PL-ACC-SUF ;
:jo PL-OBLIQUE ;

LEXICON N_KEL !kel':kel
:' SG-NOM-SUF ;
:' SG-PAR-SUF_t ;
:%>e SG-OBLIQUE ;
R ; ! xxx check
! Plural
:%>e PL-NOM-SUF ;
:%>e PL-ACC-SUF ;
: PL-OBLIQUE ;

LEXICON N_SAR1 !sar':sar
:' SG-NOM-SUF ;
: SG-PAR-SUF_t ;
:%>e SG-OBLIQUE ;
R ; ! xxx check
! Plural
:%>e PL-NOM-SUF ;
:%>e PL-ACC-SUF ;
: PL-OBLIQUE ;

LEXICON N_JOUCEN !joucen:jouc%{eØ%}
: SG-NOM-SUF ;
: SG-PAR-SUF_t ;
:%^RmVow%>e SG-OBLIQUE ;
R ; ! xxx check
! Plural
:%^RmVow%>e PL-NOM-SUF ;
:%^RmVow%>e PL-ACC-SUF ;
:%^RmVow PL-OBLIQUE ;


LEXICON N_OIGED !oiged:oig%{eØ%}d
!oi|ged (-ktan, -ktoid)
: SG-NOM-SUF ;
:%^RmVow%^DEVOICE%>a SG-OBLIQUE ;
R ; ! xxx check
! Plural
:%^RmVow%^DEVOICE%>a PL-NOM-SUF ;
:%^RmVow%^DEVOICE%>a PL-ACC-SUF ;
:%^RmVow%^DEVOICE%>o PL-OBLIQUE ;

LEXICON N_SAMAL !samal:sam%{aØ%}l
: SG-NOM-SUF ;
:%^RmVow%^DEVOICE%>o SG-OBLIQUE ;
R ; ! xxx check
! Plural
:%^RmVow%^DEVOICE%>o PL-NOM-SUF ;
:%^RmVow%^DEVOICE%>o PL-ACC-SUF ;
:%^RmVow%^DEVOICE%>o PL-OBLIQUE ;

LEXICON N_PU ! pu:pu
 N_PU-SG ;
 N_PU-PL ;
LEXICON N_PU-SG
: SG-NOM-SUF ;
: SG-OBLIQUE ;
LEXICON N_PU-PL
R ; ! xxx check
! Plural
: PL-NOM-SUF ;
: PL-ACC-SUF ;
: PL-OBLIQUE ;

LEXICON	N_VIDENZ1 ! videnz':viden (-den, -t, -zid)
:z' SG-NOM-SUF ;
: SG-PAR-SUF_t ;
:de SG-OBLIQUE ;
R ; ! xxx check
! Plural
:de PL-NOM-SUF ;
:de PL-ACC-SUF ;
:nz PL-OBLIQUE ;

LEXICON N_KODI !kodi:kodi
:i SG-NOM-SUF ;
:%>i SG-OBLIQUE ;
R ; ! xxx check
! Plural
:%>i PL-NOM-SUF ;
:%>i PL-ACC-SUF ;
: PL-OBLIQUE ;


LEXICON N_NIMI !nimi:nim
:i SG-NOM-SUF ;
:%>e SG-OBLIQUE ;
R ; ! xxx check
! Plural
:%>e PL-NOM-SUF ;
:%>e PL-ACC-SUF ;
: PL-OBLIQUE ;

LEXICON N_SARV !sarv:sarv
: SG-NOM-SUF ;
:%>e SG-OBLIQUE ;
R ; ! xxx check
! Plural
:%>e PL-NOM-SUF ;
:%>e PL-ACC-SUF ;
: PL-OBLIQUE ;


LEXICON N_CIPUINE ! cipuine:cipu
!:INE1 NMN_ ;
:ine SG-NOM-SUF ;
:š SG-PAR-SUF_t ;
:iže SG-OBLIQUE ;
R ; ! xxx check
! Plural
:iže PL-NOM-SUF ;
:iže PL-ACC-SUF ;
:iž  PL-OBLIQUE ;
