src/fst/stems/nouns.lexc
cipuine+N:cipu N_CIPUINE  "tipu" ;
kel'+N:kel N_KEL  "kieli" ;
landeh+N:land N_LANDEH  "lanne" ;
marj+N:marj N_MARJ  "marja" ;
šapuk+N:šapU1k N_SHAPUK  "tipu" ;
